West Virginia, session 2026, HB5677.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-47. Coalfield Career Pipeline Program. (a) The Coalfield Career Pipeline Program is established to expand workforce training in coalfield counties.(b) Authorized uses include mobile CTE units, paid apprenticeships, certification programs, and partnerships with local employers.(c) Priority industries include commercial driver licensing, diesel and heavy equipment mechanics, healthcare occupations, information technology, electrical, construction, and emerging energy trades.(d) Preference shall be given to multi-agency applications involving boards of education, workforce development boards, economic development authorities, county commissions, and regional planning and development councils.